Utah statutes.
53A-17a-162.    Beverley Taylor Sorenson Elementary Arts Learning Program.
(1)  The Legislature finds that a strategic placement of arts in elementary
education can impact the critical thinking of students in other core subject
areas, including mathematics, reading, and science.
(2)  The Beverley Taylor Sorenson Elementary Arts Learning Program is created
to enhance the social, emotional, academic, and arts learning of students in
kindergarten through grade six by integrating arts teaching and learning into
core subject areas.
(3)  From monies appropriated for the Beverley Taylor Sorenson Elementary Arts
Learning Program, the State Board of Education shall, after consulting with
the Utah Arts Council and receiving their recommendations:
(a)  establish a grant program to allow school districts and charter schools
to hire 50 highly qualified, full-time arts specialists to be based at 50
schools;
(b)  provide up to $10,000 in one-time funds for each school arts specialist
described under Subsection (3)(a) to purchase supplies and equipment;
(c)  establish a grant program to allow ten school districts to hire art
coordinators, provided that a qualifying school district provides matching
funds in an amount equal to the grant amount; and
(d)  annually contract with an independent, qualified evaluator, selected
through a request for proposals process, to evaluate the Beverley Taylor
Sorenson Elementary Arts Learning Program.
(4)  Beverley Taylor Sorenson Elementary Arts Learning Program monies may not
be used to supplant funds for existing programs funded by the state, but shall
be used to augment existing programs.
(5)  Schools that participate in the Beverley Taylor Sorenson Elementary Arts
Learning Program shall partner with institutions of higher education that
award elementary education degrees to obtain quality pre-service and in-
service training, research, and leadership development for arts education.
(6)  The State Board of Education shall, after consultation with the Utah Arts
Council, make an annual report during the 2009, 2010, and 2011 interims to the
Education Interim Committee describing the program's impact on students in
kindergarten through grade six.
